Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1198.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 355 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 355. Examination.--The department, or any agent authorized in writing by it, is hereby authorized to examine the books, papers and records of any taxpayer or supposed taxpayer, and to require the production of a copy of his return as made to and filed with the Federal Government, if one was so made and filed in order to verify the accuracy of any return made, or if no return was made, to ascertain and assess the tax imposed by 12345678910111213141516171819202122 this article. The department or an agent of the department shall examine in person, at the physical location of the taxpayer, any requested books, papers and records if the requested books, papers and records comprise twenty-five pages or more in total. The department shall provide the taxpayer written notification of an in-person examination of the requested books, papers and records fourteen business days prior to the in-person examination. Every such taxpayer or supposed taxpayer is hereby directed and required to give to the department or its duly authorized agent the means, facilities and opportunity for such examinations and investigations as are hereby provided and authorized. The department is hereby authorized to examine any person under oath concerning any income which was or should have been returned for taxation, and to this end may compel the production of books, papers and records and the attendance of all persons, whether as parties or witnesses, whom it believes have knowledge of such income. The procedure for such hearing or examination shall be the same as that provided by the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal [Code"] Code," relating to inquisitorial powers of fiscal officers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1198PN1347 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021